New York, session 2025-2026, S562.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 11-1904 of the environmental 2 conservation law, as added by chapter 208 of the laws of 1999, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. No person who owns, operates or manages a facility that harbors 5 non-native big game mammals shall knowingly permit: 6 a. The taking on such premises by any person who pays [a] any fee to 7 take a live non-native big game mammal by any of the following means: 8 (1) the shooting or spearing of a non-native big game mammal that is 9 tied or hobbled; 10 (2) the shooting or spearing of a non-native big game mammal that is 11 staked or attached to any object; 12 (3) the shooting or spearing of a non-native big game mammal that is 13 confined in a box, pen, cage or similar container [of ten or less 14 contiguous acres] or in a fenced or other area from which there is no 15 means for such mammal to escape; 16 (4) the deliberate release of a non-native big game mammal that is 17 confined in a box, pen, cage or similar container [of ten or less 18 contiguous acres] or in a fenced or other area from which there is no 19 means for such mammal to escape in the presence of any person who is, or 20 will be, shooting or spearing such non-native big game mammal. 21 b. For purposes of this section: 22 (1) shooting shall mean the discharge of any type of firearm or bow 23 and arrow; [and] EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01750-01-5 S. 562 2 1 (2) spearing shall mean the use of any hand or mechanically propelled 2 single or multiple pronged pike, blade, or harpoon; and 3 (3) fee shall include, but not be limited to, the payment of any 4 compensation or remuneration for room, board, meals, lodging or any 5 other goods or services on the premises. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 7 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.